Washington statutes.
RCW 39.96.040

Terms and conditions.

(1) Subject to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, payment agreements entered into by any governmental entity may include those payment, term, security, default, remedy, termination, and other terms and conditions, and may be with those parties, as the governmental entity deems reasonably necessary or desirable.

(2) No governmental entity may enter into a payment agreement under this chapter unless:

(a) The other party to the agreement has a rating from at least two nationally recognized credit rating agencies, as of the date of execution of the agreement, that is within the two highest long-term investment grade rating categories, without regard to subcategories, or the payment obligations of the party under the agreement are unconditionally guaranteed by an entity that then has the required ratings; or

(b)(i) The other party to the agreement has a rating from at least two nationally recognized credit rating agencies, as of the date of execution of the agreement, that is within the three highest long-term investment grade rating categories, without regard to subcategories, or the payment obligations of the party under the agreement are unconditionally guaranteed by an entity that has the required ratings; and

(ii) The payment obligations of the other party under the agreement are collateralized by direct obligations of, or obligations the principal and interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States of America, that (A) are deposited with the governmental entity or an agent of the governmental entity; and (B) maintain a market value of not less than one hundred two percent of the net market value of the payment agreement to the governmental entity, as such net market value may be defined and determined from time to time under the terms of the payment agreement.

(3) No governmental entity may enter into a payment agreement with a party who qualifies under subsection (2)(a) of this section unless the payment agreement provides that, in the event the credit rating of the other party or its guarantor falls below the level required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, such party will comply with the collateralization requirements contained in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(4) No governmental entity may enter into a payment agreement unless:

(a) The notional amount of the payment agreement does not exceed the principal amount of the obligations with respect to which the payment agreement is made; and

(b) The term of the payment agreement does not exceed the final term of the obligations with respect to which the payment agreement is made.

[ 1993 c 273 s 4.]